Utah statutes.
67-19e-104.   Rulemaking authority.

The department shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act:

(1)  establishing minimum performance standards for all administrative law judges;

(2)  providing procedures for filing, addressing, and reviewing complaints against administrative law judges;

(3)  providing standards for complaints against administrative law judges; and

(4)  promulgating a code of conduct for all administrative law judges in all state agencies.



Enacted by Chapter 165, 2013 General Session

